Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
445

COUNTY
LICENSES

Part I. General

Section

445-1 Definition: "Treasurer"

445-2 Treasurer to issue

445-3 Signed by whom

445-4 Fees in advance

445-5 Fees; date when due and payable

445-6 Place of business

445-7, 8 Repealed

445-9 Canceled on transferring, etc., business;
penalty

445-10 Term of license

445-11 Exposed to view; penalty

445-12 Business without license forbidden; not
transferable;

penalty

445-13 License inspectors

445-14 Limits of license

445-15 Control by ordinance

445-16 Repealed

Part II. Auction

445-21 Fee

445-22 Public auction unlawful when

445-23 Hours for auctions

445-24 Fictitious bids

445-25 Description of goods sold considered
warranties

445-26 Auction at places other than auction
room; mock

auctions

445-27 Penalty

445-28 Place of public auction room

445-29 Designation of place for business

445-30 Record books

445-31 Bond

445-32 Suit to enjoin violation and action for
damages

445-33 Suit on bond

445-34 Suit at whose cost

445-35 Auctioneer's charges

445-36 Auctioneer may sue

445-37 Public officers, etc., may sell without

license

445-38 Auctioneer's agent

Part IIA. Food Products--Repealed

445-71, 72 Repealed

Part III. Lodging or Tenement Houses,
Hotels, and

Boardinghouses

445-90 Definitions

445-90.5 Exemption

445-91 to 93 Repealed

445-94 Clearance required

445-95 Conditions for conditional operation

445-95.1 Unfair or deceptive practices prohibited

445-95.2 Unfair and deceptive practices defined

445-95.3 Powers of the director

445-95.4 Penalty

445-95.5 Suits by the State

445-95.6 Suits by individuals

445-95.7 Jurisdiction, venue

445-96 Penalty

445-97, 98 Repealed

Part IV. Outdoor Advertising

445-111 Definitions

445-112 Where and when permitted

445-112.5 Vehicular advertising prohibited; penalty

445-113 Regulation by counties

445-114 Unlawful posting in public places

445-115 Same; consent of owner

445-116 to 119 Repealed

445-120 Enforcement by civil suit

445-121 Penalty

Part V. Pawnbrokers

445-131 Definitions

445-132 Fee

445-133, 134 Repealed

445-134.11 Pawn transaction agreement; disclosure
requirements

445-134.12 Pawn finance charge

445-134.13 Prohibited practices

445-134.14 Redemption of pledged goods

445-134.15 Pawnbroker's recourse

445-134.16 Pawnbroker liability

445-134.17 Recordkeeping

445-134.18 Compliance with other applicable law

445-134.19 Conformity with federal law

445-135 Acting without license; penalty

445-136 Breach of condition; penalty

Part VI. Peddlers

445-141 Licensing

Part VII. Secondhand Dealers

445-171 Fee, conditions

445-172 Prohibitions; penalty

Part VIII. Solicitors--Repealed

445-181 to 186 Repealed

Part IX. Vehicles and Drivers for
Hire--Repealed

445-221 to 226 Repealed

Part X. Scrap Dealers

445-231 Definitions

445-232 License

445-233 Statement required

445-233.5 Payment of copper purchased by scrap
dealer or

recycler; check; mailing

445-234 Applicability

445-235 Prohibitions; penalty

Note

Repealed parts under former scheme of chapter and as
referenced in text are not reflected in above analysis.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next